Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.640

School-based threat assessment program—Model policy and procedure.

(1) The Washington state school directors' association, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall develop a model policy and procedure to establish a school-based threat assessment program that meets the requirements of RCW 28A.320.123. The model policy and procedure must be posted on the website of the state school safety center, established in RCW 28A.300.630, by January 1, 2020.

(2) In developing the model policy and procedure, the Washington state school directors' association and the office of the superintendent of public instruction must:

(a) Consult with the school safety and student well-being advisory committee, established under RCW 28A.300.635, and other organizations with expertise in school safety, behavioral health, the rights of students with disabilities, and protecting civil liberties; and

(b) Consider multilevel threat assessment programs implemented in schools in Washington.

[ 2019 c 333 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.300.630.

Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.320.124.